Louisiana, session 2026, HB663.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:342(A)(introductory paragraph) and (10) through (24) and (B)(2)
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§342. Board of commissioners; members; officers; personal immunity
A. The district shall be governed by a board of commissioners, referred to
in this Part as the "board", consisting of twenty-six twenty-three members as follows:
* * *
(10) The president of the Louisiana State University System or his designee.
(11) (10) The president of Grambling State University or his designee.
(12) (11) The state representative for House District 19 or his designee.
(13) (12) The state representative for House District 21 or his designee.
(14) (13) The state senator for Senate District 32 or his designee.
(15) (14) The state senator for Senate District 34 or his designee.
(16) (15) The mayor of the city of Tallulah or his designee.
(17) (16) The mayor of the town of Lake Providence or his designee.
(18) (17) The mayor of the town of Newellton or his designee.
(19) (18) The mayor of the town of St. Joseph or his designee.
(20) (19) The mayor of the town of Waterproof or his designee.
(21) (20) The mayor of the town of Clayton or his designee.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 663 ENROLLED
(22) (21) The mayor of the town of Ferriday or his designee.
(23) (22) The mayor of the town of Vidalia or his designee.
(24) (23) The secretary of Louisiana Economic Development or his designee
as an ex officio nonvoting member.
(24) The executive director of the Louisiana State University Center for
Energy Studies or his designee as an ex officio nonvoting member.
B.
* * *
(2) The presidents of Louisiana Tech University, University of Louisiana at
Monroe, Southern University System, Louisiana State University System, and
Grambling State University and the chair of the Louisiana Public Transit Association
shall serve as ex officio members without voting rights.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 3:342(A)(2), (25), and (26) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
alphabetize and renumber the definitions contained in R.S. 3:342(A) and to correct any
cross-references to the renumbered paragraphs if necessary, consistent with the provisions
of this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.